Utah statutes.
63G-6-808.   Rules of procedure to be adopted.
The Procurement Appeals Board shall adopt rules of procedure which, to the
fullest extent possible, will provide for the expeditious resolution of
controversies, including procedures to encourage agreements between the
parties to a controversy prior to a hearing.  The board may adopt small claims
procedures for the resolution of controversies involving claims of less than
$15,000.
